Illinois, session 104th, HB4855.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children's Mental Health Act is amended by 5adding Section 20 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 49/20 new)7    Sec. 20. Delivery and reinforcement of social and 8emotional learning instruction.9    (a) Purpose. The General Assembly finds that social and 10emotional learning is essential to academic achievement and 11student well-being, and that such instruction is most 12effective when provided by trained professionals and 13reinforced throughout the curriculum.14    (b) Definitions. As used in this Section:15    "Trained professional" means a licensed school counselor, 16school psychologist, or school social worker employed by or 17contracted with the school district.18    "Class period" means a minimum of 30 minutes or 19instructional period regularly scheduled for a core or encore 20subject in the district's daily schedule.21    "Integrated curriculum" means the intentional 22reinforcement of social and emotional learning competencies 23within classroom instruction, consistent with the Illinois   HB4855- 2 -LRB104 16605 KTG 30005 b1Social and Emotional Learning Standards adopted by the 2Illinois State Board of Education.3    (c) Instructional requirement. Each school district shall 4ensure that every student in grades K-12 receives direct 5instruction in social and emotional learning no fewer than 4 6times each academic year, approximately once per academic 7quarter. Such instruction shall:8        (1) be delivered by a trained professional;9        (2) be provided during a class period; and10        (3) address age-appropriate competencies as outlined 11    in the Illinois Learning Standards for Social/Emotional 12    Learning.13    (d) Reinforcement and integration. Classroom teachers 14shall reinforce social and emotional learning concepts through 15integrated academic curriculum and classroom practices. Each 16school district shall provide professional development to 17assist educators in aligning instructional practices with 18social and emotional learning principles. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 201, 2028.